Mississippi statutes. Title 43. Public Welfare
Article 3. Medicaid.
§ 43-13-126.
Health insurers required to provide certain information to Division of Medicaid, accept Division’s right of recovery and not deny claims submitted by Division on the basis of certain errors as condition of doing business in Mississippi.

As a condition of doing business in the state, health insurers, including self-insured plans, group health plans (as defined in Section 607(1) of the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974), service benefit plans, managed care organizations, pharmacy benefit managers, or other parties that are by statute, contract, or agreement, legally responsible for payment of a claim for a health care item or service, are required to:

Provide, with respect to individuals who are eligible for, or are provided, medical assistance under the state plan, upon the request of the Division of Medicaid, information to determine during what period the individual or their spouses or their dependents may be (or may have been) covered by a health insurer and the nature of the coverage that is or was provided by the health insurer (including the name, address and identifying number of the plan) in a manner prescribed by the Secretary of the Department of Health and Human Services;

Accept the Division of Medicaid’s right of recovery and the assignment to the division of any right of an individual or other entity to payment from the party for an item or service for which payment has been made under the state plan;

Respond to any inquiry by the Division of Medicaid regarding a claim for payment for any health care item or service that is submitted not later than three (3) years after the date of the provision of that health care item or service; and

Agree not to deny a claim submitted by the Division of Medicaid solely on the basis of the date of submission of the claim, the type or format of the claim form, or a failure to present proper documentation at the point-of-sale that is the basis of the claim, if:

The claim is submitted by the division within the three-year period beginning on the date on which the item or service was furnished; and

Any action by the division to enforce its rights with respect to the claim is begun within six (6) years of the division’s submission of the claim.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2007, ch. 553, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2007.

§ 43-13-127.
Reports and recommendations required of Division of Medicaid.

Within sixty (60) days after the end of each fiscal year and at each regular session of the Legislature, the division shall make and publish a report to the Governor and to the Legislature, showing for the period of time covered the following:

The total number of recipients;

The total amount paid for medical assistance and care under this article;

The total number of applications;

The number of applications approved;

The number of applications denied;

The amount expended for administration of the provisions of this article;

The amount of money received from the federal government, if any;

The amount of money recovered by reason of collections from third persons by reason of assignment or subrogation, and the disposition of the same;

The actions and activities of the division in detecting and investigating suspected or alleged fraudulent practices, violations and abuses of the program; and

Any recommendations it may have as to expanding, enlarging, limiting or restricting the eligibility of persons covered by this article or services provided by this article, to make more effective the basic purposes of this article; to eliminate or curtail fraudulent practices and inequities in the plan or administration thereof; and to continue to participate in receiving federal funds for the furnishing of medical assistance under Title XIX of the Social Security Act or other federal law.

In addition to the reports required by subsection (1) of this section, the division shall submit a report each month to the Chairmen of the Public Health and Welfare Committees of the Senate and the House of Representatives and to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee that contains the information specified in each paragraph of subsection (1) for the preceding month.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7290-44; Laws, 1969, Ex Sess, ch. 37, § 14; Laws, 1972, ch. 306, § 1; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 53; Laws, 1990, ch. 548, § 4; Laws, 2002, ch. 636B, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 12, 2002.).

§ 43-13-129.
Misrepresentation by applicant for benefits or by provider of services; penalty.

Any person making application for benefits under this article for himself or for another person, and any provider of services, who knowingly makes a false statement or false representation or fails to disclose a material fact to obtain or increase any benefit or payment under this article shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500.00) or imprisoned not to exceed one (1) year, or by both such fine and imprisonment. Each false statement or false representation or failure to disclose a material fact shall constitute a separate offense. This section shall not prohibit prosecution under any other criminal statutes of this state or the United States.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7290-45; Laws, 1969, Ex Sess, ch. 37, § 15, eff from and after passage (approved October 10, 1969).

§ 43-13-131.
Influencing recipient to elect particular provider or type of services for purpose of obtaining increase in benefits or payments; penalties.

Any person who shall, through intentional misrepresentation, fraud, deceit or unlawful design, either acting individually or in concert with others, influence any recipient to elect any particular provider of services, or any particular type of services, for the purposes and with the intent to obtain or increase any benefit or payment under this article shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500.00) or imprisonment not exceeding one (1) year, or by both such fine and imprisonment. This section shall not prohibit prosecution under any other criminal statutes of this state or the United States.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7290-46; Laws, 1969, Ex Sess, ch. 37, § 16, eff from and after passage (approved October 10, 1969).

§ 43-13-133.
Intent as to use of federal matching funds.

It is the intent of the Legislature that all federal matching funds for medical assistance under Titles V, XVIII and XIX of the federal Social Security Act paid into any state health agency after October 10, 1969, shall be used exclusively to defray the cost of medical assistance expended under the terms of this article.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7290-47; Laws, 1969, Ex Sess, ch. 37, § 17, eff from and after passage (approved October 10, 1969).

§ 43-13-135.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1994, ch. 649, § 14, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

[Codes, 1942, § 7290-48; Laws, 1969, Ex Sess, ch. 37, § 19; Laws, 1972, ch. 320, § 1; Laws, 1973, ch. 455, § 1; Laws, 1974, ch. 346; Laws, 1975, ch. 339; Laws, 1976, ch. 436; Laws, 1977, ch. 383; Laws, 1979, ch. 495, § 3; Laws, 1980, ch. 306; Laws, 1980, ch. 402; Laws, 1981, ch. 301, § 1; Laws, 1981, ch. 326, § 1; Laws, 1983, 2nd Ex Sess, ch. 9; Laws, 1984, ch. 372; Laws, 1988, ch. 306, § 1; Laws, 1989, ch. 527, § 7; Laws, 1990, ch. 390, § 1; Laws, 1991, ch. 612, § 4; Laws, 1992, ch. 487, § 3]

§ 43-13-137.
Division to comply with Administrative Procedure Law.

The division is an agency as defined under Section 25-43-3 and, therefore, must comply in all respects with the Administrative Procedures Law, Section 25-43-1 et seq.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7290-50; Laws, 1969, Ex Sess, ch. 37, § 21; Laws, 1981, ch. 451, § 2; Laws, 2000, ch. 301, § 12, eff from and after July 1, 1999.

§ 43-13-139.
Governor authorized to discontinue or limit medical assistance to optional groups; division to cease state funding upon discontinuance of federal funding.

Nothing contained in this article shall be construed to prevent the Governor, in his discretion, from discontinuing or limiting medical assistance to any individuals who are classified or deemed to be within any optional group or optional category of recipients as prescribed under Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act or the implementing federal regulations. If the Congress or the United States Department of Health and Human Services ceases to provide federal matching funds for any group or category of recipients or any type of care and services, the division shall cease state funding for such group or category or such type of care and services, notwithstanding any provision of this article.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 649, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§ 43-13-141.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2004 ch. 593, § 8.

[Laws, 1991, ch. 612, § 1; Laws, 1992, ch. 487, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved May 8, 1992).]

§ 43-13-143.
Medical Care Fund.

There is created in the State Treasury a special fund to be known as the “Medical Care Fund,” which shall be comprised of monies transferred by public or private health care providers, governing bodies of counties, municipalities, public or community hospitals and other political subdivisions of the state, individuals, corporations, associations and any other entities for the purpose of providing health care services. Any transfer made to the fund shall be paid to the State Treasurer for deposit into the fund, and all such transfers shall be considered as unconditional transfers to the fund. The monies in the Medical Care Fund shall be expended only for health care services, and may be expended only upon appropriation of the Legislature. All transfers of monies to the Division of Medicaid by health care providers and by governing bodies of counties, municipalities, public or community hospitals and other political subdivisions of the state shall be deposited into the fund. Unexpended monies remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund, and any interest earned on monies in the fund shall be deposited to the credit of the fund.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 612, § 2; Laws, 1992, ch. 487, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved May 8, 1992).

§ 43-13-145.
Assessment levied upon health care facilities; keeping of records; collection of assessments; effect of delinquency in payment [Subsections (4) and (10) through (15) repealed effective July 1, 2024].

Upon each nursing facility licensed by the State of Mississippi, there is levied an assessment in an amount set by the division, equal to the maximum rate allowed by federal law or regulation, for each licensed and occupied bed of the facility.

A nursing facility is exempt from the assessment levied under this subsection if the facility is operated under the direction and control of:

The United States Veterans Administration or other agency or department of the United States government;

The State Veterans Affairs Board; or

The University of Mississippi Medical Center.

Upon each intermediate care facility for individuals with intellectual disabilities licensed by the State of Mississippi, there is levied an assessment in an amount set by the division, equal to the maximum rate allowed by federal law or regulation, for each licensed and occupied bed of the facility.

An intermediate care facility for individuals with intellectual disabilities is exempt from the assessment levied under this subsection if the facility is operated under the direction and control of:

The United States Veterans Administration or other agency or department of the United States government;

The State Veterans Affairs Board; or

The University of Mississippi Medical Center.

Upon each psychiatric residential treatment facility licensed by the State of Mississippi, there is levied an assessment in an amount set by the division, equal to the maximum rate allowed by federal law or regulation, for each licensed and occupied bed of the facility.

A psychiatric residential treatment facility is exempt from the assessment levied under this subsection if the facility is operated under the direction and control of:

The United States Veterans Administration or other agency or department of the United States government;

The University of Mississippi Medical Center; or

A state agency or a state facility that either provides its own state match through intergovernmental transfer or certification of funds to the division.

Hospital assessment.

Subject to and upon fulfillment of the requirements and conditions of paragraph (f) below, and notwithstanding any other provisions of this section, effective for state fiscal years 2016 through fiscal year 2021, an annual assessment on each hospital licensed in the state is imposed on each non-Medicare hospital inpatient day as defined below at a rate that is determined by dividing the sum prescribed in this subparagraph (i), plus the nonfederal share necessary to maximize the Disproportionate Share Hospital (DSH) and Medicare Upper Payment Limits (UPL) Program payments and hospital access payments and such other supplemental payments as may be developed pursuant to Section 43-13-117(A)(18), by the total number of non-Medicare hospital inpatient days as defined below for all licensed Mississippi hospitals, except as provided in paragraph (d) below. If the state matching funds percentage for the Mississippi Medicaid program is sixteen percent (16%) or less, the sum used in the formula under this subparagraph (i) shall be Seventy-four Million Dollars ($74,000,000.00). If the state matching funds percentage for the Mississippi Medicaid program is twenty-four percent (24%) or higher, the sum used in the formula under this subparagraph (i) shall be One Hundred Four Million Dollars ($104,000,000.00). If the state matching funds percentage for the Mississippi Medicaid program is between sixteen percent (16%) and twenty-four percent (24%), the sum used in the formula under this subparagraph (i) shall be a pro rata amount determined as follows: the current state matching funds percentage rate minus sixteen percent (16%) divided by eight percent (8%) multiplied by Thirty Million Dollars ($30,000,000.00) and add that amount to Seventy-four Million Dollars ($74,000,000.00). However, no assessment in a quarter under this subparagraph (i) may exceed the assessment in the previous quarter by more than Three Million Seven Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($3,750,000.00) (which would be Fifteen Million Dollars ($15,000,000.00) on an annualized basis). The division shall publish the state matching funds percentage rate applicable to the Mississippi Medicaid program on the tenth day of the first month of each quarter and the assessment determined under the formula prescribed above shall be applicable in the quarter following any adjustment in that state matching funds percentage rate. The division shall notify each hospital licensed in the state as to any projected increases or decreases in the assessment determined under this subparagraph (i). However, if the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services (CMS) does not approve the provision in Section 43-13-117(39) requiring the division to reimburse crossover claims for inpatient hospital services and crossover claims covered under Medicare Part B for dually eligible beneficiaries in the same manner that was in effect on January 1, 2008, the sum that otherwise would have been used in the formula under this subparagraph (i) shall be reduced by Seven Million Dollars ($7,000,000.00).

In addition to the assessment provided under subparagraph (i), effective for state fiscal years 2016 through fiscal year 2021, an additional annual assessment on each hospital licensed in the state is imposed on each non-Medicare hospital inpatient day as defined below at a rate that is determined by dividing twenty-five percent (25%) of any provider reductions in the Medicaid program as authorized in Section 43-13-117(F) for that fiscal year up to the following maximum amount, plus the nonfederal share necessary to maximize the Disproportionate Share Hospital (DSH) and inpatient Medicare Upper Payment Limits (UPL) Program payments and inpatient hospital access payments, by the total number of non-Medicare hospital inpatient days as defined below for all licensed Mississippi hospitals: in fiscal year 2010, the maximum amount shall be Twenty-four Million Dollars ($24,000,000.00); in fiscal year 2011, the maximum amount shall be Thirty-two Million Dollars ($32,000,000.00); and in fiscal year 2012 and thereafter, the maximum amount shall be Forty Million Dollars ($40,000,000.00). Any such deficit in the Medicaid program shall be reviewed by the PEER Committee as provided in Section 43-13-117(F).

In addition to the assessments provided in subparagraphs (i) and (ii), effective for state fiscal years 2016 through fiscal year 2021, an additional annual assessment on each hospital licensed in the state is imposed pursuant to the provisions of Section 43-13-117(F) if the cost containment measures described therein have been implemented and there are insufficient funds in the Health Care Trust Fund to reconcile any remaining deficit in any fiscal year. If the Governor institutes any other additional cost containment measures on any program or programs authorized under the Medicaid program pursuant to Section 43-13-117(F), hospitals shall be responsible for twenty-five percent (25%) of any such additional imposed provider cuts, which shall be in the form of an additional assessment not to exceed the twenty-five percent (25%) of provider expenditure reductions. Such additional assessment shall be imposed on each non-Medicare hospital inpatient day in the same manner as assessments are imposed under subparagraphs (i) and (ii).

Payment and definitions.

The hospital assessment as described in this subsection (4) shall be assessed and collected monthly no later than the fifteenth calendar day of each month; provided, however, that the first three (3) monthly payments shall be assessed but not be collected until collection is satisfied for the third monthly (September) payment and the second three (3) monthly payments shall be assessed but not be collected until collection is satisfied for the sixth monthly (December) payment and provided that the portion of the assessment related to the DSH payments shall be paid in three (3) one-third (1/3) installments due no later than the fifteenth calendar day of the payment month of the DSH payments required by Section 43-13-117(A)(18), which shall be paid during the second, third and fourth quarters of the state fiscal year, and provided that the assessment related to any UPL payment(s) shall be paid no later than the fifteenth calendar day of the payment month of the UPL payment(s) and provided assessments related to hospital access payments will be collected beginning the initial month that the division funds MHAP.

Definitions. For purposes of this subsection (4):

1. “Non-Medicare hospital inpatient day” means total hospital inpatient days including subcomponent days less Medicare inpatient days including subcomponent days from the hospital’s most recent Medicare cost report for the second calendar year preceding the beginning of the state fiscal year, on file with CMS per the CMS HCRIS database, or cost report submitted to the Division if the HCRIS database is not available to the division, as of June 1 of each year.

a. Total hospital inpatient days shall be the sum of Worksheet S-3, Part 1, column 8 row 14, column 8 row 16, and column 8 row 17, excluding column 8 rows 5 and 6.

b. Hospital Medicare inpatient days shall be the sum of Worksheet S-3, Part 1, column 6 row 14, column 6 row 16.00, and column 6 row 17, excluding column 6 rows 5 and 6.

c. Inpatient days shall not include residential treatment or long-term care days.

2. “Subcomponent inpatient day” means the number of days of care charged to a beneficiary for inpatient hospital rehabilitation and psychiatric care services in units of full days. A day begins at midnight and ends twenty-four (24) hours later. A part of a day, including the day of admission and day on which a patient returns from leave of absence, counts as a full day. However, the day of discharge, death, or a day on which a patient begins a leave of absence is not counted as a day unless discharge or death occur on the day of admission. If admission and discharge or death occur on the same day, the day is considered a day of admission and counts as one (1) subcomponent inpatient day.

The assessment provided in this subsection is intended to satisfy and not be in addition to the assessment and intergovernmental transfers provided in Section 43-13-117(A)(18). Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize any state agency, division or department, or county, municipality or other local governmental unit to license for revenue, levy or impose any other tax, fee or assessment upon hospitals in this state not authorized by a specific statute.

Hospitals operated by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs and state-operated facilities that provide only inpatient and outpatient psychiatric services shall not be subject to the hospital assessment provided in this subsection.

Multihospital systems, closure, merger, change of ownership and new hospitals.

If a hospital conducts, operates or maintains more than one (1) hospital licensed by the State Department of Health, the provider shall pay the hospital assessment for each hospital separately.

Notwithstanding any other provision in this section, if a hospital subject to this assessment operates or conducts business only for a portion of a fiscal year, the assessment for the state fiscal year shall be adjusted by multiplying the assessment by a fraction, the numerator of which is the number of days in the year during which the hospital operates, and the denominator of which is three hundred sixty-five (365). Immediately upon ceasing to operate, the hospital shall pay the assessment for the year as so adjusted (to the extent not previously paid).

The division shall determine the tax for new hospitals and hospitals that undergo a change of ownership in accordance with this section, using the best available information, as determined by the division.

Applicability.

The hospital assessment imposed by this subsection shall not take effect and/or shall cease to be imposed if:

The assessment is determined to be an impermissible tax under Title XIX of the Social Security Act; or

CMS revokes its approval of the division’s 2009 Medicaid State Plan Amendment for the methodology for DSH payments to hospitals under Section 43-13-117(A)(18).

This subsection(4) is repealed on July 1, 2024.

Each health care facility that is subject to the provisions of this section shall keep and preserve such suitable books and records as may be necessary to determine the amount of assessment for which it is liable under this section. The books and records shall be kept and preserved for a period of not less than five (5) years, during which time those books and records shall be open for examination during business hours by the division, the Department of Revenue, the Office of the Attorney General and the State Department of Health.

Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, the assessment levied under this section shall be collected by the division each month.

All assessments collected under this section shall be deposited in the Medical Care Fund created by Section 43-13-143.

The assessment levied under this section shall be in addition to any other assessments, taxes or fees levied by law, and the assessment shall constitute a debt due the State of Mississippi from the time the assessment is due until it is paid.

If a health care facility that is liable for payment of an assessment levied by the division does not pay the assessment when it is due, the division shall give written notice to the health care facility by certified or registered mail demanding payment of the assessment within ten (10) days from the date of delivery of the notice. If the health care facility fails or refuses to pay the assessment after receiving the notice and demand from the division, the division shall withhold from any Medicaid reimbursement payments that are due to the health care facility the amount of the unpaid assessment and a penalty of ten percent (10%) of the amount of the assessment, plus the legal rate of interest until the assessment is paid in full. If the health care facility does not participate in the Medicaid program, the division shall turn over to the Office of the Attorney General the collection of the unpaid assessment by civil action. In any such civil action, the Office of the Attorney General shall collect the amount of the unpaid assessment and a penalty of ten percent (10%) of the amount of the assessment, plus the legal rate of interest until the assessment is paid in full.

As an additional or alternative method for collecting unpaid assessments levied by the division, if a health care facility fails or refuses to pay the assessment after receiving notice and demand from the division, the division may file a notice of a tax lien with the chancery clerk of the county in which the health care facility is located, for the amount of the unpaid assessment and a penalty of ten percent (10%) of the amount of the assessment, plus the legal rate of interest until the assessment is paid in full. Immediately upon receipt of notice of the tax lien for the assessment, the chancery clerk shall forward the notice to the circuit clerk who shall enter the notice of the tax lien as a judgment upon the judgment roll and show in the appropriate columns the name of the health care facility as judgment debtor, the name of the division as judgment creditor, the amount of the unpaid assessment, and the date and time of enrollment. The judgment shall be valid as against mortgagees, pledgees, entrusters, purchasers, judgment creditors and other persons from the time of filing with the clerk. The amount of the judgment shall be a debt due the State of Mississippi and remain a lien upon the tangible property of the health care facility until the judgment is satisfied. The judgment shall be the equivalent of any enrolled judgment of a court of record and shall serve as authority for the issuance of writs of execution, writs of attachment or other remedial writs.

To further the provisions of Section 43-13-117(A)(18), the Division of Medicaid shall submitto the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services (CMS) any documents regarding the hospital assessment established under subsection (4) of this section.In addition to defining the assessment established in subsection (4) of this section if necessary, the documentsshall describe any supplement payment programs and/or payment methodologies as authorized in Section 43-13-117(A)(18) if necessary.

All hospitals satisfying the minimum federal DSH eligibility requirements (Section 1923(d) of the Social Security Act) may, subject to OBRA 1993 payment limitations, receive a DSH payments. This DSH payment shall expend the balance of the federal DSH allotment and associated state share not utilized in DSH payments to state-owned institutions for treatment of mental diseases. The payment to each hospital shall be calculated by applying a uniform percentage to the uninsured costs of each eligible hospital, excluding state-owned institutions for treatment of mental diseases; however, that percentage for a state-owned teaching hospital located in Hinds County shall be multiplied by a factor of two (2).

The division shall implement DSH and supplemental payment calculation methodologies that result in the maximization of available federal funds.

The DSHpayments shall be paid on or before December 31, March 31, and June 30 of each fiscal year, in increments of one-third (1/3) of the total calculated DSH amounts. Supplemental payments developed pursuant to Section 43-13-117(A)(18) shall be paid monthly.

The hospital assessment as described in subsection (4) above shall be assessed and collected monthly no later than the fifteenth calendar day of each month; provided, however, that the first three (3) monthly payments shall be assessed but not be collected until collection is satisfied for the third monthly (September) payment and the second three (3) monthly payments shall be assessed but not be collected until collection is satisfied for the sixth monthly (December) payment and provided that the portion of the assessment related to the DSH payments shall be paid in three (3) one-third (1/3) installments due no later than the fifteenth calendar day of the payment month of the DSH payments required by Section 43-13-117(A)(18), which shall be paid during the second, third and fourth quarters of the state fiscal year, and provided that the assessment related to any supplemental payment programs developed pursuant to Section 43-13-117(A)(18) shall be paid no later than the fifteenth calendar day of the payment month of the payment(s).

If for any reason any part of the plan for annual DSH and supplemental payment programs to hospitals provided under subsection (10) of this section and/or developed pursuant to Section 43-13-117(A)(18) is not approved by CMS, the remainder of the plan shall remain in full force and effect.

Nothing in this section shall prevent the Division of Medicaid from facilitating participation in Medicaid supplemental hospital payment programs by a hospital located in a county contiguous to the State of Mississippi that is also authorized by federal law to submit intergovernmental transfers (IGTs) to the State of Mississippi to fund the state share of the hospital’s supplemental and/or MHAP payments.

Subsections (10) through (15) of this section shall stand repealed on July 1, 2024.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 487, § 7; Laws, 2002, ch. 636B, § 5; Laws, 2003, ch. 543, § 6; Laws, 2004, ch. 593, § 6; Laws, 2005, ch. 470, § 3; brought forward without change, Laws, 2008, ch. 360, § 3; Laws, 2009, 2nd Ex Sess, ch. 118, § 3; Laws, 2012, ch. 530, § 4; Laws, 2013, 2nd Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 4; Laws, 2014, ch. 488, § 5; Laws, 2015, ch. 483, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 22, 2015); Laws, 2018, ch. 310, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2018; Laws, 2018, ch. 440, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§ 43-13-147.
Mississippi Medicaid Program and Children’s Health Insurance Program to examine and improve hospital discharge and follow-up care procedures for certain premature infants and implement programs to improve newborn outcomes; reporting of data regarding rehospitalization of certain premature infants.

The Mississippi Medicaid Program and the Children’s Health Insurance Program, in consultation with statewide organizations focused on premature infant healthcare, shall:

Examine and improve hospital discharge and follow-up care procedures for premature infants born earlier than thirty-seven (37) weeks gestational age to ensure standardized and coordinated processes are followed as premature infants leave the hospital from either a Level 1 (well baby nursery), Level 2 (step down or transitional nursery) or Level 3 (neonatal intensive care unit) unit and transition to follow-up care by a health care provider in the community; and

Use guidance from the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services’ Neonatal Outcomes Improvement Project to implement programs to improve newborn outcomes, reduce newborn health costs and establish ongoing quality improvement for newborns.

Data regarding the incidence and cause of rehospitalization in the first six (6) months of life for infants born premature at earlier than thirty-seven (37) weeks gestational age shall be reported to the Chairman of the House Public Health and Human Services Committee and the Chairman of the Senate Public Health and Welfare Committee by the Mississippi State Department of Health utilizing the mandated hospital discharge data system authorized in Section 41-63-4.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2009, ch. 553, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

§ 43-13-149.
Repealed.

Repealed by its own terms, effective July 1, 2017.

§43-13-149. [Laws, 2015, ch. 473, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2015.]